dictsource/gn_rules
// guaraní translation rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// Last update: 22 april 2016

.replace
ʻ	' // guarani puso U+02BB
â	ã
î	ĩ
ô	õ
û	ũ
ŷ	ỹ
ğ	ĝ

.group '
	'	_!
	A) ' (A	_!

.group a
	a	a

.group á
	á	''a

.group ã
	ã	''a~

.group e
	e	e

.group é
	é	''e

.group ẽ // latin e with tilde
	ẽ	''e~

.group ê
	ê	''e~

.group i
	i	i

.group í
	í	''i

.group ĩ
	ĩ	''i~

.group o
	o	o

.group ó
	ó	''o

.group õ
	õ	''o~

.group u
	u	u

.group ú
	ú	''u

.group ũ
	ũ	''u~

.group y
	y 	y

.group ý
	ý	''y

.group ỹ // latin y with tilde
	ỹ	''y~

// consonants

.group g
	g	g

.group ĝ
	ĝ	n.

.group h
	h	h

.group j
	j	J^

.group k
	k	k

.group l
	l	l

.group m
	m	m

.group n
	n	n

.group ñ
	ñ	n^

.group p
	p	p

.group r
	r	r
	A) r (A	r
	rr	R2

.group s
	s	s

.group t
	t	t

.group v
	v	b
	A) v (A	B

.group ch
	ch	S

.group mb
	mb	mb

.group nd
	nd	Nd

.group ng
	ng	Ng

.group nt
	nt	Nt

.group rr
	rr	R2

// Characters not included in achegety

.group b
	b	b

.group c
	c	k
	_) ch	S
	c (Y	T // spanish words
	ck	k:

.group d
	d	d

.group f
	f	f

.group q
	q	k
	qu (Y	 k

.group w
	w	w
	wh	w

.group x
	x	ks

.group z
	z	T
	zz	ts
